Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.080

County clerk's funds may be deposited.

The county clerks of all the counties of the state shall deposit all funds in their custody, as clerk of the superior court of their respective counties, in one or more qualified depositaries, as provided in chapter 39.58 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1973 c 126 s 7; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.080. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 40 s 1; RRS s 5561-1.]